Mississippi statutes. Title 43. Public Welfare
Adjustment Center for the Blind

§ 43-3-1.
Short title.

Sections 43-3-1 through 43-3-15 shall be cited as “The Adjustment Center for the Blind Law of 1968.”

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6708-61; Laws, 1968, ch. 436, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1968.

§ 43-3-3.
Declaration of public policy.

It is declared that the state public welfare demands and the state public policy requires that a state facility be built and a state program be established that can teach and assist individuals who are blind to adjust to and become a useful part of society; that in addition to existing facilities and vocational and rehabilitation programs for individuals who are blind in Mississippi, an Adjustment Center for Individuals who are Blind is needed to assist those persons in adopting attitudes, behavior patterns, and otherwise becoming acclimated for a full, more useful and productive life.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6708-62; Laws, 1968, ch. 436, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1968; Laws, 2002, ch. 463, § 23, eff from and after July 1, 2002.

§ 43-3-5.
Establishment, maintenance, and control of facility.

The directors of the University of Mississippi Medical School and Teaching Hospital, with the direction of the Office of Vocational Rehabilitation for the Blind of the State Department of Rehabilitation Services, may establish, maintain and supervise an Adjustment Center for Individuals who are Blind at the University of Mississippi Medical Center in Jackson, Mississippi, and shall jointly govern the facility.

The governing authorities shall appoint a director and shall employ such other technical, professional and clerical assistance as may be required from time to time and fix their duties and compensation. All employees and other personnel must be qualified by education and experience.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6708-63; Laws, 1968, ch. 236, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 1968; Laws, 2002, ch. 463, § 24, eff from and after July 1, 2002.

§ 43-3-7.
Rules and regulations.

The governing authorities shall promulgate such reasonable rules and regulations as are necessary to carry out the intent of Sections 43-3-1 through 43-3-15. Any such rules and regulations shall be published and kept on file in the office of the director and shall be available to the general public on demand.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6708-64; Laws, 1968, ch. 236, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 1968.

§ 43-3-9.
Medical school and hospital personnel to cooperate in carrying out intent of law.

The directors, professors, physicians, and all other personnel employed at the University of Mississippi Medical School and Teaching Hospital shall offer full cooperation to the Office of Vocational Rehabilitation for the Blind of the State Department of Rehabilitation Services in carrying out the intent of Sections 43-3-1 through 43-3-15.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6708-65; Laws, 1968, ch. 236, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 1968; Laws, 2002, ch. 463, § 25, eff from and after July 1, 2002.

§ 43-3-11.
Acquisition of public funds for constructing and equipping center; acceptance of gifts and grants.

The agencies named or referred to are authorized separately or collectively to cooperate with any agency or instrumentality of the state or of the United States government in acquiring public funds for use in the constructing and equipping of the Adjustment Center for Individuals who are Blind and for use in the subsequent administration and operation incidental to carrying out the provisions of Sections 43-3-1 through 43-3-15. Grants or donations to the center may be accepted from individuals, firms, corporations, foundations and other interested organizations and societies.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6708-66; Laws, 1968, ch. 236, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 1968; Laws, 2002, ch. 463, § 26, eff from and after July 1, 2002.

§ 43-3-13.
Department of Finance and Administration authorized to build facility; funds appropriated or granted to be deposited in State Treasury.

The Department of Finance and Administration is authorized to build a suitable facility, and payment for construction of that building shall be made from any money made available for this purpose.

Any funds appropriated or granted from any source for purposes of Sections 43-3-1 through 43-3-15 shall be deposited into a fund in the State Treasury to be designated The Adjustment Center for Individuals who are Blind Fund.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6708-67; Laws, 1968, ch. 236, § 7, eff from and after July 1, 1968; Laws, 2002, ch. 463, § 27, eff from and after July 1, 2002.

§ 43-3-15.
Construction of law.

This law shall be construed to be supplemental and in addition to any present laws governing the agencies specified in Sections 43-3-1 through 43-3-15. Whenever a conflict exists between such sections and any of said present laws, the provisions of Sections 43-3-1 through 43-3-15 will control.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6708-68; Laws, 1968, ch. 236, § 8, eff from and after July 1, 1968.